en: omelette, omelet
ar: العجة
az: Omlet
be: Амлет
bg: Омлет
bn: ডিম ভাজি
br: Alumenn
ca: Truita d'ous
cs: omeleta
da: Æggekage
de: Omelett
el: Ομελέτα
eo: omleto
es: omelet, tortilla
et: Omlett
eu: Arrautzopil
fa: املت
fi: Munakas
fr: omelette
gd: Bonnach-uighe
gl: Tortilla francesa
he: חביתה
hi: ऑमलेट
hr: omlet
hy: Օմլետ
id: Telur dadar
io: Omleto
it: omelette
ja: オムレツ
jv: Omelet
kk: Табиғи омлет
ko: 오믈렛
lt: Omletas
mk: Омлет
ml: ഓംലെറ്റ്
mr: आम्लेट
nb: omelett
nl: omelet
nn: omelett
oc: omelette
pl: Omlet
pt: omelete
ro: Scrob
ru: омлет
si: ඔම්ලට්
sq: Omleta
sr: Омлет
su: Goréng endog
sv: Omelett
te: పొరటు
th: ไข่เจียว
tl: Torta
tr: Omlet
uk: Омлет
ur: آملیٹ
vi: Omelette
zh: 西式蛋餅

en: crust, rind
de: Rinde, Kruste
es: corteza
fi: kuori
fr: croûte
hr: kora
it: crosta
nl: korst

en: cheese rind, cheese crust
de: Käserinde
fi: juustokuori
hr: kora od sira
it: crosta di formaggio
nl: kaaskorst
ru: сырная корочка

en: inedible crust
de: Unessabare Kruste
fr: croûte non comestible, croûte non consommable
hr: nejestiva kora
it: Crosta non commestibile
nl: korst niet eetbaar

en: light custard cream with vanilla, crème anglaise, creme anglaise
de: Englische Creme
fr: crème anglaise

en: English sauce
fr: sauce anglaise

en: chorizo, chorizos, Spicy pork sausage with red pepper no precision
xx: chorizo
be: Чарыза
bg: Чорисо
ca: xoriço
el: Τσορίθο
eo: Ĉorizo
es: chorizo extra
eu: Txorizo
fa: چوریزو
gl: Chourizo
he: צ'וריסו
hy: Չորիսո
ja: チョリソ
ko: 초리소
nl: chorizos
pl: chorizo
pt: chouriço
ru: Чоризо
tl: Longganisa
uk: Чорісос
zh: 乔利佐

en: black pudding
ca: baldana
de: Black Pudding, Blutwurst
es: morcilla
hr: crni puding
it: sanguinaccio

en: ice cream, ice creams
ab: аршәы
af: Roomys
am: አይስ ክሬም
ar: مثلجات
az: Dondurma
ba: туңдырма
be: марожанае
bg: Сладолед
bn: আইসক্রিম
br: dienn-skorn
bs: Sladoled
ca: gelat, gelats
cs: zmrzlina
cy: Hufen iâ
da: flødeis
de: Speiseeis, Eiscreme
el: Παγωτό
eo: glaciaĵo
es: helado, helados
et: jäätis
eu: Izozki
fa: بستنی
fi: jäätelö
fr: crème glacée
fy: rjemme-iis
ga: Uachtar reoite
gd: Reòiteag
gl: Xeado
gn: Typy'are'ẽ
gu: આઇસ્ક્રીમ
gv: key riojey
he: גלידה
hi: आइसक्रीम
hr: sladoled
ht: krèm
hu: Jégkrémek, fagylalt
hy: Պաղպաղակ
ia: gelato
id: Es krim
is: Rjómaís
it: gelato
ja: アイスクリーム
jv: Ès krim
ka: ნაყინი
kk: балмұздақ
km: ការ៉េម
kn: ಐಸ್ ಕ್ರೀಂ
ko: 아이스크림
ku: Bestenî
kv: Лымвый
ky: мороженое
la: Glacies edibilis
lb: Glace
li: roumies
lo: ສີຄີມ ກ້ອນ
lt: Ledai
lv: saldējums
mi: aihikiriimi
mk: сладолед
ml: ഐസ്‌ക്രീം
mn: цэцгийн мэхээлдэс
mr: आईसक्रीम
ms: aiskrim
mt: ġelat
my: ရေခဲမုန့်
nb: iskrem
nl: roomijs
nn: iskrem
nv: Abeʼ yistiní
or: ଆଇସ କ୍ରୀମ
pa: ਆਈਸ ਕਰੀਮ
pl: Lody
pt: gelado, sorvete
rm: glatsch
ro: înghețată
ru: мороженое
se: lákcajiekŋa
sh: Sladoled
si: අයිස් ක්‍රීම්
sk: Zmrzlina
sl: Sladoled
sm: aisakulimi
so: Jalaato
sq: akullorja
sr: сладолед
st: aesekerimi
su: Éskrim
sv: glass, gräddglass
sw: aiskrimu
ta: குளிர்களி
te: ఐస్ క్రీం
tg: Яхмос
th: ไอศกรีม
tk: dongdurma
tl: Sorbetes
tr: Dondurma
tt: туңдырма
ug: ماروژنا
uk: морозиво
ur: آئس کریم
uz: muzqaymoq
vi: kem lạnh
wo: galaas
yi: אייזקרעם
zh: 冰淇淋
zu: u-ayisikhilimu

en: vanilla ice cream
bg: ванилов сладолед
ca: gelat de vainilla
da: vaniljeis
de: Vanille-Eis, Vanilleeis
eo: vanila glaciaĵo
es: helado de vainilla
fa: بستنی وانیلی
fi: vaniljajäätelö
fr: glace à la vanille
hr: sladoled od vanilije
hy: վանիլային պաղպաղակ
it: Gelato alla vaniglia
nl: Vanille-ijs, vanilleijs
pt: gelado de baunilha, sorvete de baunilha
tr: Vanilyalı dondurma
uk: Ванільне морозиво
vi: Kem vani
zh: 香草冰淇淋

en: chocolate ice cream
bg: шоколадов сладолед
de: Schokoladen-Eiscreme, Schokoladen-Eis, Schokoladeneis
es: helado de chocolate
fi: suklaajäätelö
fr: glace au chocolat
hr: čokoladni sladoled
it: gelato al cioccolato
nl: chocoladeijs
pt: gelado de chocolate, sorvete de chocolate

en: panna cotta
xx: panna cotta
ar: باناكوتا
az: Pana Kota
be: Панакота
bg: Панакота
bn: পান্না কত্তা
ca: panacota
el: Πανακότα
eu: panacota
fa: پاناکوتا
fi: pannacotta
he: פנקוטה
ja: パンナ・コッタ
ka: პანა კოტა
kn: ಪನ್ನ ಕೊಟ್ಟ
ko: 판나 코타
ml: പന്ന കോട്ട
pa: ਪਾਨਾ ਕੋਤਾ
ru: панна котта
th: ปันนาค็อตตา
uk: Панна котта
zh: 意式奶凍

en: Refrigerated panna cotta
fr: Panna cotta rayon frais
it: panna cotta refrigerata

en: zuppa inglese flavor preparation
hr: pasta okusa deserta zuppa inglese
it: preparazione gusto Zuppa inglese

en: panna cotta flavor preparation
hr: pripravak okusa panna cotta
it: preparato gusto panna cotta

en: lingonberry jam
be: бруснічнае варэнне
da: tyttebærsyltetøj
de: preiselbeermarmelade
es: mermelada de arándano rojo
et: pohlamoos
fi: puolukkahillo
fr: confiture d'airelle
hr: džem od brusnica
id: selai lingonberry
it: confettura di mirtilli rossi, confettura di mirtillo rosso, marmellata di mirtillo rosso, marmellata di mirtilli rossi, confettura ai mirtilli rossi
ja: リンゴンベリー・ジャム
ko: 월귤잼
nb: tyttebærsyltetøy
sv: lingonsylt
uk: брусничне варення

en: blackcurrant jam
de: Marmelade mit schwarzen Johannisbeeren
fi: mustaherukkahillo
hr: pekmez od crnog ribiza
it: confettura di ribes, confettura di ribes nero, confettura al ribes nero

en: jam, confiture
de: Konfitüre
fr: confiture
it: confettura, confetture
pl: dżem
ru: джем, повидло, варенье

en: marmalade
de: Marmelade
hr: marmelada, marmelada miješano voće
it: marmellata

en: strawberry jam, strawberry maramalade
bg: конфитюр от ягоди
ca: melmelada de maduixa
de: Erdbeerkonfitüre, Erdbeer-Konfitüre
es: mermelada de fresa
fr: Confiture de fraises
hr: pripavak jagoda
it: confettura di fragole, marmellata di fragole
pl: dżem truskawkowy